Washington statutes.
RCW 15.53.9038

Department's remedies for noncompliance—"Withdrawal from distribution" order—Condemnation—Seizure.

(1) When the department has reasonable cause to believe that any lot of commercial feed is adulterated or misbranded or is being distributed in violation of this chapter or any rules hereunder it may issue and enforce a written or printed "withdrawal from distribution" order, or "stop sale" order, warning the distributor not to dispose of the lot of feed in any manner until written permission is given by the department. The department shall release the lot of commercial feed so withdrawn when the provisions and rules have been complied with. If compliance is not obtained within thirty days, parties may agree to an alternative disposition in writing or the department may institute condemnation proceedings in a court of competent jurisdiction.

(2) Any lot of commercial feed not in compliance with the provisions and rules is subject to seizure on complaint of the department to a court of competent jurisdiction in the area in which the commercial feed is located. If the court finds the commercial feed to be in violation of this chapter and orders the condemnation of the commercial feed, it shall be disposed of in any manner consistent with the quality of the commercial feed and the laws of the state. The court shall first give the claimant an opportunity to apply to the court for release of the commercial feed or for permission to process or relabel the commercial feed to bring it into compliance with this chapter.

[ 1995 c 374 s 42; 1982 c 177 s 5; 1975 1st ex.s. c 257 s 7; 1965 ex.s. c 31 s 16.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1995 c 374 ss 1-47, 50-53, and 59-68: See note following RCW 15.36.012.

Effective date—1975 1st ex.s. c 257: See note following RCW 15.13.470.